Wisconsin, session 2025, SB66.
do enact as follows:SB66,1Section 1. 347.495 of the statutes is created to read:347.495 Registration plate concealment device. (1) In this section, “registration plate concealment device” means a manual, electronic, or mechanical device designed or adapted to be installed on a motor vehicle to do any of the following:(a) Switch between 2 or more registration plates.(b) Move, obstruct, or conceal a registration plate.(c) Alter the appearance of a registration plate so that the registration number cannot be seen and read.(2) No person may possess, sell, purchase, install, or use a registration plate concealment device.(3) No motor vehicle may be equipped with a registration plate concealment device.(4) Any motor vehicle equipped in violation of sub. (3) may be impounded. A vehicle impounded under this subsection shall be returned to the owner upon payment of reasonable costs of towing and impounding the vehicle.SB66,2Section 2. 347.50 (6) of the statutes is created to read:347.50 (6) Any person violating s. 347.495 may be fined not more than $1,000 or imprisoned for not more than 90 days, or both. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/sb66 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/sb66 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB66 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB66 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»SB66: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting